Utah statutes.
62A-15-646.   Commitment and care of criminally insane.
Nothing contained in this part may be construed to alter or change the method
presently employed for the commitment and care of the criminally insane as
provided in Title 77, Chapter 15, Inquiry into Sanity of Defendant.
